Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.230

Acquisition of land under RCW 36.75.210 and 36.75.220.

For the purpose of carrying into effect RCW 36.75.210 and 36.75.220 and under the circumstances therein set out the boards may acquire land necessary for the right-of-way for any portion of a county road lying outside such county or counties by gift or purchase or by condemnation in the manner provided for the taking of property for public use by counties.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.75.230. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 25, part; RRS s 6450-25, part.]